Alabama, session 2026rs, HB397.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
25 Section 1. Sections 40-9-19, 40-9-19.1, and 40-9-21,
26 Code of Alabama 1975, are amended to read as follows:
27 "§40-9-19
28 (a)(1) Homesteads, as defined by the Constitution and
Page 1

(a)(1) Homesteads, as defined by the Constitution and
HB397 INTRODUCED
29 laws of Alabama, are exempt from all state ad valorem taxes.
30 In no case shall theThe exemption shall not apply to more than
31 one personindividual or head of the family, nor shall the
32 exemption exceed four thousand dollars ($4,000) in assessed
33 value or 160 acres in area for any resident of this state who
34 is not over 65 years of age.
35 (2) The homesteadhomesteads of a residentresidents of
36 this state, shall be exempt from all state ad valorem taxes if
37 the individual is:
38 a. Over over 65 years of age;
39 b. Retired, or who are retired due to permanent and
40 total disability, regardless of age;
41 c. Blind, or who are blind as defined in Section 1-1-3,
42 regardless of age or whether the individual such person is
43 retired,; or
44 d. The unremarried widow or widower of a decedent
45 exempt pursuant to this subsection at his or her death shall
46 be exempt from all state ad valorem taxes. This paragraph
47 shall only apply:
48 1. To the homestead claimed by the decedent at the time
49 of his or her death;
50 2. If the name of the unremarried widow or widower is
51 on the deed of the property; and
52 3. If the annual adjusted gross income of the
53 unremarried widow or widower does not exceed one hundred fifty
54 thousand dollars ($150,000).
55 (3) The state Commissioner of Revenue may define and
56 specify the condition or state of health that makes a person
Page 2

specify the condition or state of health that makes a person
HB397 INTRODUCED
57 an individual "permanently and totally disabled" and may issue
58 certificates of disability to the person individual as he or
59 she may find meets such specifications. Any personindividual
60 who is drawing any pension or annuity from the United States
61 Armed Forcesarmed services or a company or governmental agency
62 as being permanently and totally disabled shall automatically
63 be granted a certificate of permanent and total disability by
64 the state Commissioner of Revenue.
65 (b) For tax years beginning on and after October 1,
66 1981, for residents of this state not over 65 years of age,
67 homesteads, as defined by the Constitution and laws of
68 Alabama, are exempt from all ad valorem property taxes levied,
69 except countywide and school district ad valorem taxes levied
70 for school purposes, by any county of this state. In no case
71 shall theThe exemption shall not apply to more than one
72 personindividual or head of the family, nor shall the
73 exemption exceed two thousand dollars ($2,000) in assessed
74 value or 160 acres in area for any resident of this state who
75 is not over 65 years of age except as provided in subsection
76 (c).
77 (c) For tax years beginning on and after October 1,
78 1981, theThe governing body of any county, municipality, or
79 other local taxing authority may at any time grant by
80 resolution or ordinance an exemption from any levy of ad
81 valorem property taxes levied by suchthe county, municipality,
82 or other local taxing authority on homesteads, as defined by
83 the Constitution and laws of Alabama, of residents of this
84 state not over 65 years of age. In no case shall suchthe
Page 3

state not over 65 years of age. In no case shall suchthe
HB397 INTRODUCED
85 exemption allowed in this section apply to more than one
86 personindividual or head of the family, nor shall the
87 exemption, when added to any other homestead exemption
88 applicable to the same ad valorem tax levy, exceed four
89 thousand dollars ($4,000) in assessed value or 160 acres in
90 area. Any homestead exemption granted pursuant to this
91 subsection (c) may be adjusted, rescinded, or reinstated at
92 any time by resolution or ordinance of the governing body of
93 the county, municipality, or other local taxing authority
94 granting such exemption. Any action authorized by this
95 subsection to be taken by a taxing authority, or the governing
96 body thereof, other than in the case of a municipality, shall
97 be taken by resolution of the governing body of the county in
98 which suchthe taxing authority is located acting on behalf of
99 suchthe taxing authority; provided, however, any action
100 authorized by this subsection to be taken by a taxing
101 authority, or the governing body thereof, which action shall
102 affect countywide or district ad valorem taxes levied solely
103 for the support of county or city school districts, shall be
104 taken by resolutions of the governing bodies and boards of the
105 school systems that are recipients of the proceeds of the ad
106 valorem tax so affected by suchthe action. This subsection
107 shall in no waynot annul or reduce exemptions provided under
108 subsections (a), (b), and (d).
109 (d)(1) For tax years beginning on and after October 1,
110 1981, forHomesteads, as defined in the Constitution and laws
111 of Alabama, of residents of this state are exempt from ad
112 valorem prooperty taxes levied by any county of this state,
Page 4

valorem prooperty taxes levied by any county of this state,
HB397 INTRODUCED
113 including ad valorem taxes levied for school districts, if the
114 individual is:
115 a. overOver 65 years of age who haveand has an annual
116 adjusted gross income of less than $12,000sixteen thousand
117 dollars ($16,000) or less, as reflected on the most recent
118 state income tax return or some other appropriate evidence,;
119 b. or who are retired Retired due to permanent and
120 total disability, regardless of age,;
121 c. or who are blind Blind as defined in Section 1-1-3,
122 regardless of age or whether such personthe individual is
123 retired,; or
124 d. The unremarried widow or widower of a decedent
125 exempt pursuant to this subsection at his or her death
126 homesteads, as defined in the Constitution and laws of
127 Alabama, are exempt from ad valorem property taxes levied by
128 any county of this state, including such taxes levied for
129 school districts. This paragraph shall only apply:
130 1. To the homestead claimed by the decedent at the time
131 of his or her death;
132 2. If the name of the unremarried widow or widower is
133 on the deed of the property; and
134 3. If the annual adjusted gross income of the
135 unremarried widow or widower does not exceed one hundred fifty
136 thousand dollars ($150,000).
137 (2) In no case shall the exemption exceed five thousand
138 dollars ($5,000) in assessed value or 160 acres in area. With
139 respect to homesteads situated in more than one county, the
140 exemption shall be prorated between the counties in which the
Page 5

exemption shall be prorated between the counties in which the
HB397 INTRODUCED
141 homestead is situated in the proportion that the area of the
142 homestead in each county bears to the total area of the
143 homestead claimed for exemption.
144 (3) The Department of Revenue, by rule, may define and
145 specify the condition or state of health that makes a personan
146 individual "permanently and totally disabled" and may issue
147 certificates of disability to any personindividual that meets
148 suchthe specifications. Any personindividual who is drawing
149 any pension or annuity from the armed servicesUnited States
150 Armed Forces, a private company, or any governmental agency
151 because he or she is permanently and totally disabled shall
152 automatically be granted a certificate of permanent and total
153 disability by the Department of Revenue.
154 (e) The grant of any homestead exemption provided under
155 this section shall not be allowed if such grant shall prevent
156 the payment of any bonded indebtedness secured by any tax to
157 which the homestead exemption would apply.
158 (f) Any homestead exemption under this section or
159 Section 40-9-21 shall not be affected during any period the
160 homestead is being repaired after being damaged by a natural
161 disaster such as a tornado or hurricane."
162 "§40-9-19.1
163 (a)(1) The governing body of any municipality may, upon
164 the request of the board of education of suchthe municipality,
165 may grant, by resolution, an exemption in whole or in part
166 from the increased portion of any ad valorem property tax
167 which has been increased pursuant to the procedures specified
168 in paragraphsubdivision (f) of Amendment No. 373Section 217
Page 6

in paragraphsubdivision (f) of Amendment No. 373Section 217
HB397 INTRODUCED
169 toof the Constitution of Alabama of 19012022 for public school
170 purposes, on the homesteadshomestead of residentsa resident of
171 suchthe municipality who is:
172 a. overOver 65 years of age;,
173 b. or who are retiredRetired due to permanent and
174 total disability, regardless of age;,
175 c. or who are blindBlind, as defined in Section 1-1-3,
176 regardless of age or whether such personthe individual is
177 retired.; or
178 d. The unremarried widow or widower of a decedent
179 exempt pursuant to this section at his or her death. This
180 paragraph shall only apply:
181 1. To the homestead claimed by the decedent at the time
182 of his or her death;
183 2. If the name of the unremarried widow or widower is
184 on the deed of the property; and
185 3. If the annual adjusted income of the unremarried
186 widow or widower does not exceed one hundred fifty thousand
187 dollars ($150,000).
188 (2) Any homestead exemption granted pursuant to this
189 section may be adjusted, rescinded, or reinstated at any time
190 upon the request of the board of education of suchthe
191 municipality by resolution of the governing body of suchthe
192 municipality. Any request made by a board of education
193 regarding an exemption pursuant to this section shall be made
194 by a resolution adopted by suchthe board of education.
195 (b) The provisions of this section shall in no waynot
196 annul or reduce exemptions provided under any other provisions
Page 7

annul or reduce exemptions provided under any other provisions
HB397 INTRODUCED
197 of the Constitution and laws of Alabama."
198 "§40-9-21
199 (a)(1) In addition to the personsindividuals and
200 property exempt from ad valorem taxation as prescribed in
201 Section 40-9-1, the following shall also be exempt from ad
202 valorem taxation: The principal residence and 160 acres
203 adjacent thereto of any personindividual who is:
204 a. permanentlyPermanently and totally disabled;
205 b. or who is Over 65 years of age or older havingand
206 has a net annual taxable income of twelve thousand dollars
207 ($12,000)sixteen thousand dollars ($16,000) or less, as shown
208 on such person'sthe individual's and spouse's latest United
209 States income tax return or some other appropriate evidence
210 acceptable to the department.; or
211 c. The unremarried widow or widower of the decedent
212 exempt pursuant to this section at his or her death. This
213 paragraph shall only apply:
214 1. To the homestead claimed by the decedent at the time
215 of his or her death;
216 2. If the name of the unremarried widow or widower is
217 on the deed of the property; and
218 3. If the annual adjusted gross income of the
219 unremarried widow or widower does not exceed one hundred fifty
220 thousand dollars ($150,000).
221 (2)a. In the event that such person and spouse areAn
222 individual that is not required to file a United States income
223 tax return, then may file an affidavit indicating that the net
224 taxable income of such personthe individual and spouse for the
Page 8

taxable income of such personthe individual and spouse for the
HB397 INTRODUCED
225 preceding taxable year was twelvesixteen thousand dollars
226 ($12,000)($16,000) or less. This affidavit shall be sufficient
227 proof for paragraph (a)(1)b.
228 b. An individual shall furnish proof Proof of age shall
229 be furnished when theseeking an exemption under paragraph
230 provided herein is claimed(a)(1)b.
231 (3) On and after May 22, 2013, ifIf a permanently and
232 totally disabled personindividual does not qualify for the
233 exemption under this section, and has not previously submitted
234 written certification of such permanent and total disability
235 by any two physicians licensed to practice in this state, he
236 or she may submit as proof of permanent and total disability
237 affidavits from two physicians licensed to practice in this
238 state, provided that at least one of these physicians is
239 actively providing treatment directly related to the permanent
240 and total disability of the personindividual seeking the
241 exemption; provided, however, this requirement shall not apply
242 to any personindividual receiving the exemption on May 22,
243 2013.
244 (4) As provided under this section, any
245 personindividual who is drawing any pension or annuity from
246 the armed servicesUnited States Armed Forces or a company or
247 governmental agency because he or she is permanently and
248 totally disabled shall automatically be granted a certificate
249 of permanent and total disability by the department.
250 (5) In order toTo qualify for exemption under this
251 section, the property must be a single-family home owned and
252 occupied during the tax year as the principal residence of the
Page 9

occupied during the tax year as the principal residence of the
HB397 INTRODUCED
253 personindividual qualifying under this section.
254 (b) The departmentDepartment of Revenue, shall by rule,
255 shall establish the criteria and proof required for an
256 exemption in this section based upon a personan individual
257 being "permanently and totally disabled" and shall issue
258 certificates of disability to any personindividual that meets
259 such criteria and provides the required proof. The rule shall
260 provide that any personindividual who is drawing any pension
261 or annuity from the armed servicesUnited States Armed Forces,
262 a private company, or any governmental agency because he or
263 she is permanently and totally disabled shall automatically be
264 granted a certificate of permanent and total disability by the
265 department."
266 Section 2. The provisions of this act apply to tax
267 years beginning on or after January 1, 2027.
268 Section 3. The Department of Revenue may adopt rules to
269 implement this act.
270 Section 4. This act shall become effective on June 1,
271 2026.
Page 10